Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1218.5] Failure to maintain age
verification records of sexually exploited individuals. (1) A person
commits the offense of failure to maintain age verification records of sexually
exploited individuals if, with the intent to profit therefrom, the person
knowingly provides sexually exploited individuals to patrons or customers of a
public establishment or provides sexually exploited individuals to a private
club or event, and the person:

(a) Knowingly fails to create and maintain age
verification records for each sexually exploited individual;

(b) Knowingly makes or causes to be made any false
entry into the age verification records of sexually exploited individuals
required by this section; or

(c) Knowingly fails to produce the age verification
records of sexually exploited individuals required by this section upon request
by a law enforcement officer for the purpose of verifying the age of a sexually
exploited individual.

(2) Failure to maintain age verification
records of sexually exploited individuals is a class C felony. [L 2002, c 240,
pt of §3]

COMMENTARY ON §712-1218.5

Act 240, Session Laws 2002, added this section to establish
criminal penalties against those who participate in or profit from the sexual
exploitation of a minor.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next